Hawaii statutes.
[§662D-4] Limited liability for volunteers
for activities at public skateboard parks. (a) A volunteer who designs,
constructs, maintains, or repairs a skateboard park for a governmental entity
shall not be liable to any person for injury or damage sustained when using a
public skateboard park, except for injury or damages resulting from gross
negligence or intentional misconduct.

(b) No nonprofit organization or nonprofit
corporation that provides volunteers to a governmental entity to design,
construct, maintain, or repair a public skateboard park shall be liable to any
person for injury or damage sustained when using a public skateboard park,
except under the doctrine of respondeat superior. [L 2003, c 144, §4]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next